test/src/morphology/V-laskw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - laskõ: # Verb 35 'eng /est lasta/fin' - full paradigm
     laskõ+V+Inf: laskõ
     laskõ+V+Ger: laskõs
     laskõ+V+Sup: laskõm
     laskõ+V+Sup+Ine: laskõmõs
     laskõ+V+Sup+Ela: laskõmõst
     laskõ+V+Sup+Tra: laskõmõks
     laskõ+V+Sup+Abe: laskõmõt
     laskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laskūb
     laskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: laskõt
     laskõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: laskūbõd
     laskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: laskīz
     laskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [laskīzt, laskīztõ]
     laskõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [laskīzt, laskīztõ]
     laskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lask
     laskõ+V+Cond+Sg3: laskõks
     laskõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lask
     laskõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: lask
     laskõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: laskõgid
     laskõ+V+Jus+Sg3: laskõg
     laskõ+V+Quo+Sg3: laskiji
     laskõ+V+ActPrfPrc: laskõn
     laskõ+V+PssPrfPrc: lastõd
